Utah statutes.
63A-5-303.   Lease reporting and coordination.

(1)  The director shall:

(a)  prepare a standard form upon which agencies and other state institutions and entities can report their current and proposed lease activity, including any lease renewals; and

(b)  develop procedures and mechanisms within the division to:

(i)  obtain and share information about each agency's real property needs; and

(ii)  provide oversight and review of lessors and lessees during the term of each lease.

(2)  Each agency, the Judicial Council, and the Board of Regents for each institution of higher education shall report all current and proposed lease activity on the standard form prepared by the division to:

(a)  the State Building Board; and

(b)  the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst.

